Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.270

State treasurer receiving agent of certain federal aid—Acts enumerated.

The state treasurer is designated as agent of the state of Washington to receive all federal appropriations for the land grant colleges in accordance with the following federal acts:

(1) Second Morrill act, approved August 30, 1890 (26 Stat. L. 417).

(2) Nelson amendment to the Morrill act making appropriations for the department of agriculture for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1908, approved March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. L. 1281).

(3) Title II, section 22 of the Bankhead-Jones act, approved June 29, 1935 (49 Stat. L. 436).

(4) Any subsequent federal act appropriating funds to the state of Washington or to Washington State University for a similar or related purpose.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.270. Prior: 1955 c 66 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.80.221.]